apertium-leu.leu.lexd
# Morphological Transducer for Kara

# Part of speech categories
# <n>      # Noun
# <v>      # Verb
# <adj>    # Adjective
# <num>    # Numeral

# <sent>   # Sentence-ending punctuation
# <guio>   # Hyphen
# <cm>     # Comma
# <apos>   # Apostrophe
# <quot>   # Quotation mark
# <lquot>  # Left quotation mark
# <rquot>  # Right quotation mark
# <lpar>   # Left parenthesis
# <rpar>   # Right parenthesis
# Number morphology
# <pl>     # Plural
# <sg>     # Singular

# Other symbols
# >        # Morpheme boundary

###############################################################################
###                       M O R P H O T A C T I C S                         ###
###############################################################################

PATTERNS
## Example inflection pattern:
# NounRoot RegNounInfl
Number
Punctuation


## Example inflection lexicon:
# LEXICON RegNounInfl
# <n><sg>:
# <n><pl>:>s


###############################################################################
###                          L E X I C O N                                  ###
###############################################################################

## Example stem lexicon:
# LEXICON NounRoot
# house:house   # A noun

LEXICON Nouns
balätasem:balätasem #taro type
besisi:besisi # taro type 
bänigin:bänigin # pumpkin 
bi:bi # basket
bina:bina #place/village
bofin:bofin # plank (to sit on)
bok:bok # kind/type
bun:bun # smoke
burum:burum # fern 
butnã:butnã # taro type
dãrim:dãrim # peace
dãrip:dãrip # banana type
demdem:demdem # snail shell
#dim:dim # this entry is slightly unclear
dimfteafäfilin:dimfteafäfilin # June (all food is ready)
dimguf:dimguf # May (food is ready)
din:din # (fish (general))
enaj:enaj #inlaws (daughter or son)
#fakäliu a funa wäi:fakäliu a funa wäi # fairy ring type mushroom # not sure about multiword nouns
falagia:falagia #tree type
faläj:faläj # tree (nut)
faram:faram # stone pile where fish hide 
farun:farun # tree
fasei:fasei # tree type
fäxäna:fäxäna # branch of tree
fäk:fäk # teeth (one's own)
fäkälimän:fäkälimän # sign
#fäliu:fäliu # Unsure 
fäjanäi:fäjanäi # party
fäsävul:fäsävul # tree type
fät:fät # stone
fäta:fäta # fire
fävus:fävus # flesh
feo:feo # whistle
ferawäyan:ferawäyan # word/speech
ferin:ferin # pandanus type
fetinen:fetinen # sibling of the same sex
fiäian:fiäian # question
fitun:fitun # tree type
fom:fom # tree type
fuän:fuän # fat/grease
fui:fui # hair
fulun:fulun # moon
#fulun saxa:fulun saxa # banana type 
fun:fun # turtle
funa:funa # origin
fut:fut # banana (general term)
gagala:gagala # broom
galaj:galaj # vein of leaf
gälakmäi:gälakmäi # parrot (red)
gïsan:gïsan # sickness
gof:gof # nothing/vacant
gun:gun # sand/beach
xalat:xalat # bean
xanuf:xanuf # scales
x'atkät:x'atkät # snail
xäbare:xäbare # taro type
xäbul:xäbul # shell (cowrie)
xädula:xädula # lily
xäfä:xäfä # fish type
xäfiu:xäfiu # tree type
xäxat:xäxat # clam 
xäxäk:xäxäk # support post 
xäxälat:xäxälat # green coconut 
xäxälua:xäxälua # image/picture/shadow
xäxälus:xäxälus # skink (blue tailed)
xäxätäp:xäxätäp # fish type 
xäxäul:xäxäul # crab (black cooker)
xäij:xäij # sea (generally)
xäkap:xäkap # shoulder
xäkäi:xäkäi # rake 
xäkäp:xäkäp # tree type 
xälaxäl:xälaxäl # baskwash/wave/current 
xälapuj:xälapuj # bird type (swallow)
xäläirik:xäläirik # crab (lives in sea under rocks)
xäläsmätun:xäläsmätun # tree type 
xälele:xälele # fish type (small, caught in nets)
xälema:xälema # tongue 
xälena:xälena # fruit
xäleo:xäleo # canoe 
xälili:xälili # taro type 
xälin:xälin # shell (turban)
xälowa:xälowa # banana type
xälu:xälu # shadow
xäm:xäm # shell (general)
xänäi:xänäi # bird type / tern
xäpäs:xäpäs # fish type 
xäpu:xäpu # lizard/monitor
xäput:xäput # shell/clam
xärame:xärame # taro type
#xärämus simaxo: xärämus simaxo # taro type
xäräu:xäräu # lizard/black monitor
xäre:xäre # root
xäriu:xäriu # bamboo
xäroräu:xäroräu # fish type / striped reef fish 
xäs:xäs # gall bladder 
xäsij:xäsij # edge/side 
xäsijak:xäsiak # side/my side 
xät:xät # fish type 
xätana:xätana # tree type 
xätita:xätita # tree type 
xätolok:xätolok # egg
xätu:xätu # hermit crab
xäva:xäva # testicles 
xävala:xävala # ground 
xävatäi:xävatäi # leaves (used as plates at mumu)
xävil:xävil # part/wall
xävupus:xävupus # tree type 
xävus:xävus # reed type/red bush
xäwa:xäwa # rubbish
xäwas:xäwas # ride 
xäwä:xäwä # cemetary 
xäwäm:xäwäm # fish type 
xäyäu:xäyäu # fish type 
#xeak mänu:xeak mänu # tree type
xefus:xefus # new leaf
xeläwa:xeläwa # fish type
xemu:xemu # shell/clam (small white fluted)
xenawa:xenawa # tree type
xesuna:xesuna # his cousin
xet:xet # upright stakes 
xeva:xeva # fish type/puffer fish 
xila:xila # bird type / green parrot 
xirol:xirol # crab (white ghost sand crab)
xiruwa:xiruwa # tree type 
xisäu:xisäu # bird type
xiui:xiui # fish type 
xiula:xiula # tree type
xiuj:xiuj # fish type (large)
xiwäk:xiwäk # bird type
xof:xof # snow/dust/mist/hail
xoxäu:xoxäu # yam
xoxok:xoxok # sister in law (tambu term)
xoi:xoi # pig (black)
xokof:xokof # head covering/protection 
xokom:xokom # pleiades
xokanäu:xokanäu # sorceress
xokup:xokup # tree type
xokus:xokus # story/legend
#xom musuj:xom musuj # taro type 
xona:xona # (his) belly
xoj:xoj # tree type
xorej:xorej # cicada 
xoväk:xoväk # (drinking) coconut
xufuak:xufuak # gall bladder 
xufulun:xufulun # fish type
xulävä:xulävä # fish type
xulxul:xulxul # taro type
xup:xup # tree type
#xup wupuj:xup wupuj # fish type
xure:xure # river snail shell
xusi:xusi # rat
xutät:xutät # freshwater crayfish 
ifak:ifak # cousins (Children of fathers sister)
imuj:imuj # mother or father in law
inäu:inäu # outrigger crosspieces 
irin:irin # (white) magic/medicine
isa:isa # name 
ivin:ivin # bed 
kä:kä # leg 
käi:käi # bird type (grey herron)
käksäxa:käksäxa # spirit 
kälak:kälak # (my) child 
kälajäi:kälajäi # taro type 
käläj:käläj # taro type
käläpua:käläpua # banana type
käläta:käläta # banana type
kämsivuiga:kämsivuiga # (my) ankle
käremul:käremul # taro type
kik:kik # grass (with racene)
kila:kila # fish 
kiril:kiril # taro type
kokämät:kokämät # fish type
kolumäna:kolumäna # (his) neck
#kon täda:kon täda # taro type
kor:kor # bird type (crow)
kuga:kuga # fish type
kui:kui # firewood
laxasäi:laxasäi # letter/message
lak:lak # child
lalamon:lalamon # heart
lalevusa:lalevusa # plant type (orchid)
lamak:lamak # coconut leaf 
las:las # smell/odor/aroma 
läbile:läbile # banana type 
lälä:lälä # fish type 
läläxan:läläxan # banana type 
läm:läm # tree type 
läman:läman # ocean (beyond the reef)
lämäs:lämäs # coconut meat 
läj:läj # fly
läriäf:läriäf # fish type
läs:läs # lime powder (chewed with betelnut)
lätan:lätan # bush/jungle
läudu:läudu # banana type
lävula:lävula # taro stick (part planted in ground)
lävuj:lävuj # (in/at) night
leaf:leaf # afternoon
leawen:leawen # day before yesterday
lifu:lifu # house
ligoi:ligoi # (large tree) ant 
lixilot:lixilot # hat for singing
limut:limut # tree moss
liu:liu # sling / sling stone
loläu:loläu #tree type (red fruit similar to apple or pear)
lua:lua # twins
luxom:luxom # (reef) crab (burries itself in sand)
lujas:lujas # taro type
mak:mak # (my) hand 
maläxon:maläxon # banana type
malesa:malesa # fish type / barracuda 
malugis:malugis # taro type
malus:malus # fish type (small sardine type without scales)
mamara:mamara # bush type / bilas bush 
mamuwän:mamuwän # right hand 
majäf:majäf # bird type 
maraja:maraja # lobe 
maraja:maraja # taro type 
maräs:maräs # cancer (sores inside)
marej:marej # bird type 
maruf:maruf # shade 
masif:masif # taro type 
masoj:masoj # bristle
matäk:matäk # (my) eye 
matäniäs:matäniäs #sea snake (black and white, poisonous)
mädeu:mädeu # tree type 
mädixa:mädixa # flying fox 
mäfa:mäfa # shell type / murex 
mägawa:mägawa # fish type 
mäxala:mäxala # fish type 
mäkala:mäkala # singapo (potato substitute)
mäläp:mäläp # fish type 
mälfisa:mälfisa # bird type 
mälif:mälif # bird type 
mälila:mälila # (many/group of) people
mälisä:mälisä # fish type 
mälu:mälu # wind 
mämät:mämät # funeral 
mänijek:mänijek # fish type 
mänonäf:mänonäf # January (do not have food yet)
mänoroxo:manoroxo # February (plants start to come up )
mänu:mänu # bird (generally)
mäjalas:mäjalas # comet 
märapi:märapi # laplap (cloth) material
märawäs:märawäs # tree type 
märere:märere # fish type 
märiäi:märiäi # price 
märiäs:märiäs # dry season  
märis:märis # vine rop (used for making sago shingles)
märof:märof # fish type 
märuläj:märuläj # fish type 
mäsak:mäsak # pain 
mäsaläi:mäsaläi # evil spirit 
mäsajena:mäsajena # fork of a tree 
mäta:mäta # man 
#mätana dua:mätana dua # window (eye of the door)
mätäfetäma:mätäfetäma # family 
mätäxek:mätäxek # tree type (good for posts)
mätäligärät;mätäligärät # fish type 
mätävilui:mätävilui # fish type 
mätun:mätun # fish type 
mäyaj:mäyaj # (dry) coconut 
melasof:melasof # meaning 
meleskäk:meleskäk # swing 
memäi:memäi # bossman of clan 
memäyäj:memäyäj # fish type 
meskä:meskä # flesh 
meut:meut # guard (The men who sit at night with a dead body)
mif:mif # dream 
mimisut:mimisut # gecko 
minimäs:minimäs # taro type 
misu:misu # tree type 
mo:mo # thing (usually a prefix)
mobit:mobit # taro type 
mofu:mofu # tomorrow 
mogäbe:mogäbe # fish type (porpoise)
moxotaga:moxotaga # children of FS
monänäu:monänäu # fish type 
morän:morän # (green tree) python 
motäp:motäp # forbidden (thing)
motitia:motitia # (things from) singsing dance 
mu:mu # shell type/black lipped cone 
mulmul:mulmul # fish type 
mun:mun # stove for mumu 
munujak:munujak # bird type 
mus:mus # spirit-being 
mut:mut # tree type 
mut:mut # crushed sago 
naxa:naxa # tree type / bitum 
nat:nat # (little) pig
natok:natok # (my) child 
näxä:näxä # fish type 
näk:nääk # (my) thought/idea 
nämu:nämu # mosquito
näsana:näsana # (his) wife 
nätu:nätu # tree type (has green tomato like fruit)
nävä:nävä # fish type 
nej:nej # poison 
#nik pänabuso: nik pänabuso # taro type
#nik tanagäk: nik tanagäk # taro type 
nim:nim # mumu packet 
#ninäm päp:ninäm päp # (your) stepmother
ninäj:ninäj # (my) mother
niu:niu # nest 
nobina:nobina # office/position/place
nonomät:nonomät # reef (front edge)
nui:nui # fish type / stone fish (very poisonous)
nunus:nunus # tree type
jalis:jalis # feather 
jajät:jajät # ant 
jajexa:jajexa # (my) seat/place 
jäi:jäi # type of nut 
järaf:järaf # taro type 
jäs:jäs # sun 
jäum:jäum # rafter 
jis:jis # bird type 
jit:jit # banana type 
jit:jit # sand flea 
jujan:jujan # white magic 
jujut:jujut # plant (purple flowers, dry seeds look like lice)
juruväpoj:juruvapoj # protectoress 
jusu:jusu # nose 
oraga:oraga # possom 
oronusa:oronusa # island 
